Hawaii statutes.
[§132D-17.5] County ordinances. (a)
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supersede or in any manner affect
a county fireworks ordinance; provided that the ordinance is at least as
stringent in the control or prohibition of fireworks as the law under this
chapter.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a
county from enacting ordinances that are more stringent in the control or
prohibition of fireworks than this chapter. [L 2010, c 170, §1]

Case Notes

Honolulu city
ordinance prohibiting the importation of consumer fireworks into Honolulu was
an ordinance that was "more stringent in the control or prohibition of
fireworks" enacted within the city's power granted under this chapter.
796 F. Supp. 2d 1261 (2011).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next